Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 23. Permanent Fund Dividends.

Revisor’s notes. —

Chapter 99, SLA 1985 established, subject to a contingency requiring legislative action, an annuity program funded by permanent fund dividends.
The contingency was never satisfied and the sections establishing the proposed annuity program were repealed by § 17, ch. 20, SLA 2002.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the Permanent Fund Corporation, see AS 37.13.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend distribution, see 7 AAC 38.

For Alaska permanent fund dividend, see 15 AAC 23.

Opinions of attorney general. —

If the legislature enacts any other distribution program which is consistent with the intent of the permanent fund dividend law (AS 43.23), any appropriation to implement that program will be exempt from the appropriation limit of § 16, art. IX, of the state constitution.
1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

The Alaska Permanent Fund, as currently constituted, should not be subject to federal income tax because it is an asset of the State of Alaska and its income is earned directly by the State of Alaska or, in the alternative, because it is an integral part of the State of Alaska. Further, the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation, as currently constituted, should not be subject to federal income tax because it is an integral part of the State of Alaska or, in the alternative, because its income, if any, is excluded from federal income tax under
Section 115(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (the “Code”). In addition, the adoption of constitutional amendments incorporating into the Constitution a requirement for payment of the permanent fund dividend and a requirement that a portion of Fund earnings be used to defray the State’s obligations to fund public education should not change the federal tax status of the Fund or the Corporation.
2003 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 12.